Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 2. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO LICENSING

CHAPTER 54. EXAMINATION ON RELIGIOUS HOLY DAY; EXAMINATION ACCOMMODATIONS FOR PERSON WITH DYSLEXIA

Sec. 54.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Religious holy day" means a day on which the tenets of a religious organization prohibit the organization's members from participating in secular activities.

(2) "Religious organization" means an organization that qualifies under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

(3) "State agency" means an agency in the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government that administers an examination for licensing or other regulatory purposes.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 54.002. EXAMINATION SCHEDULED ON RELIGIOUS HOLY DAY. (a) Each state agency shall adopt a procedure to permit an examinee who wishes to observe a religious holy day on which the person's religious beliefs prevent the person from taking an examination to take an examination scheduled to be administered by the agency on that religious holy day on an alternate date.

(b) Each state agency shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 54.003. EXAMINATION ACCOMMODATIONS FOR PERSON WITH DYSLEXIA. (a) In this section, "dyslexia" has the meaning assigned by Section 51.970, Education Code.

(b) For each licensing examination administered by a state agency, the agency shall provide reasonable examination accommodations to an examinee diagnosed as having dyslexia.

(c) Each state agency shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section, including rules to establish the eligibility criteria an examinee must meet for accommodation under this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 867), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.